Washington statutes.
RCW 11.12.265

Filing of original will with court before death of testator.

Any person who has custody or control of any original will and who has not received knowledge of the death of the testator may deliver the will for filing under seal to any court having jurisdiction. The testator may withdraw the original will so filed upon proper identification. Any other person, including an attorney-in-fact or guardian of the testator, may withdraw the original will so filed only upon court order after showing of good cause. Upon request and presentation of a certified copy of the testator's death certificate, the clerk shall unseal the file. This section does not preclude filing a will not under seal and does not alter any duty of a person having knowledge of the testator's death to file the will.

[ 2004 c 72 s 1.]